Washington statutes.
RCW 9.38.060

Digital signature violations.

(1) A person shall not knowingly misrepresent the person's identity or authorization to obtain a public key certificate used to reference a private key for creating a digital signature.

(2) A person shall not knowingly forge an electronic or digital signature.

(3) A person shall not knowingly present a public key certificate for which the person is not the owner of the corresponding private key in order to obtain unauthorized access to information or engage in an unauthorized transaction.

(4) A person who violates this section is guilty of a class C felony punishable under chapter 9A.20 RCW.

(5)(a) "Digital signature" means an electronic signature that is a transformation of a message using an asymmetric cryptosystem such that a person who has the initial message and the signer's public key can accurately determine whether the:

(i) Transformation was created using the private key that corresponds to the signer's public key; and

(ii) Initial message has been altered since the transformation was made.

(b) "Electronic signature" has the meaning provided in RCW 1.80.010.

[ 2020 c 57 s 24; 2019 c 132 s 1; 2001 c 39 s 1.]